scripts/ru_lemmas/pos/n.lexd
alafzor<n>:луг<n>
алафзор<n>:луг<n>
albům<n>:альбом<n>
албу̊м<n>:альбом<n>
albůn<n>:альбом<n>
албу̊н<n>:альбом<n>
alwand<n>:подготовка_тока_для_молотьбы<n>
алwанд<n>:подготовка_тока_для_молотьбы<n>
alwo<n>:халва<n>
алwо<n>:халва<n>
alwo<n>:имя_собств_жен_или_его_компонент<n>
алwо<n>:имя_собств_жен_или_его_компонент<n>
alwobaӡ<n>:мастерица_готовить_халву<n>
алwобаӡ<n>:мастерица_готовить_халву<n>
alwopaӡ<n>:мастерица_готовить_халву<n>
алwопаӡ<n>:мастерица_готовить_халву<n>
alwůn<n>:кумач<n>
алwу̊н<n>:кумач<n>
alile<n>:плач<n>
алиле<n>:плач<n>
alif<n>:алиф<n>
алиф<n>:алиф<n>
alif<n>:черта<n>
алиф<n>:черта<n>
alif<n>:имя_собственное_или_его_компонент<n>
алиф<n>:имя_собственное_или_его_компонент<n>
alif<n>:олифа<n>
алиф<n>:олифа<n>
alifbê<n>:азбука<n>
алифбê<n>:азбука<n>
alifbo<n>:азбука<n>
алифбо<n>:азбука<n>
aylok<n>:пресный_сыр<n>
айлок<n>:пресный_сыр<n>
alyok<n>:пресный_сыр<n>
алйок<n>:пресный_сыр<n>
alyumīn<n>:алюминий<n>
алйумӣн<n>:алюминий<n>
alumīn<n>:алюминий<n>
алумӣн<n>:алюминий<n>
allo<n>:безудержный_плач<n>
алло<n>:безудержный_плач<n>
alo<n>:безудержный_плач<n>
ало<n>:безудержный_плач<n>
alloz<n>:прыжок<n>
аллоз<n>:прыжок<n>
aloz<n>:прыжок<n>
алоз<n>:прыжок<n>
almasti<n>:ведьма<n>
алмасти<n>:ведьма<n>
almasti<n>:обжора<n>
алмасти<n>:обжора<n>
almos<n>:алмаз<n>
алмос<n>:алмаз<n>
almos<n>:кварц<n>
алмос<n>:кварц<n>
almos-žīr<n>:кварц<n>
алмос-жӣр<n>:кварц<n>
a-lo<n>:сестра<n>
а-ло<n>:сестра<n>
a-lo<n>:обращение_родственников_друг_к_другу<n>
а-ло<n>:обращение_родственников_друг_к_другу<n>
alow<n>:огонь<n>
алоw<n>:огонь<n>
alowā<n>:пламя<n>
алоwā<n>:пламя<n>
alowgār<n>:кочегар<n>
алоwгāр<n>:кочегар<n>
alow-zibidak<n>:прыганье_через_огонь<n>
алоw-зибидак<n>:прыганье_через_огонь<n>
alow-parak<n>:прыганье_через_огонь<n>
алоw-парак<n>:прыганье_через_огонь<n>
alok<n>:гибель<n>
алок<n>:гибель<n>
alokat<n>:гибель<n>
алокат<n>:гибель<n>
aloki<n>:туша_архара<n>
алоки<n>:туша_архара<n>
aloli<n>:годный_для_убоя<n>
алоли<n>:годный_для_убоя<n>
aločā<n>:алча<n>
алочā<n>:алча<n>
aloqador<n>:имеющий_отношение<n>
алоқадор<n>:имеющий_отношение<n>
aloqadori<n>:наличие_связей<n>
алоқадори<n>:наличие_связей<n>
aloqamand<n>:имеющий_отношение<n>
алоқаманд<n>:имеющий_отношение<n>
aloqā<n>:связь<n>
алоқā<n>:связь<n>
aloqā<n>:пара_подков<n>
алоқā<n>:пара_подков<n>
alpinīst<n>:альпинист<n>
алпинӣст<n>:альпинист<n>
altoy<n>:помесь_волка_с_собакой<n>
алтой<n>:помесь_волка_с_собакой<n>
altoy<n>:собака<n>
алтой<n>:собака<n>
alůmat<n>:знак<n>
алу̊мат<n>:знак<n>
alɣaw-bozor<n>:гвалт<n>
алғаw-бозор<n>:гвалт<n>
alɣow<n>:супряга<n>
алғоw<n>:супряга<n>
alɣowdak<n>:род_коршуна<n>
алғоwдак<n>:род_коршуна<n>
alɣoɣdak<n>:род_коршуна<n>
алғоғ̌дак<n>:род_коршуна<n>
ɣilwoɣdak<n>:род_коршуна<n>
ғилwоғ̌дак<n>:род_коршуна<n>
alɣanǰol<n>:слива<n>
алғ̌анҷол<n>:слива<n>
alq<n>:горло<n>
алқ<n>:горло<n>
alqanǰak<n>:вид_узла<n>
алқанҷак<n>:вид_узла<n>
alqā<n>:петля<n>
алқā<n>:петля<n>
amak<n>:дядя<n>
амак<n>:дядя<n>
amakyůn<n>:дядя<n>
амакйу̊н<n>:дядя<n>
mak<n>:дядя<n>
мак<n>:дядя<n>
makyůn<n>:дядя<n>
макйу̊н<n>:дядя<n>
amak<n>:дядюшка<n>
амак<n>:дядюшка<n>
amakyůn<n>:дядюшка<n>
амакйу̊н<n>:дядюшка<n>
mak<n>:дядюшка<n>
мак<n>:дядюшка<n>
makyůn<n>:дядюшка<n>
макйу̊н<n>:дядюшка<n>
amak-bačā<n>:двоюродный_брат<n>
амак-бачā<n>:двоюродный_брат<n>
amakī<n>:дядя<n>
амакӣ<n>:дядя<n>
makī<n>:дядя<n>
макӣ<n>:дядя<n>
amal<n>:название_месяца_солнечного_календаря<n>
амал<n>:название_месяца_солнечного_календаря<n>
amal<n>:выкуп_за_невесту<n>
амал<n>:выкуп_за_невесту<n>
amal<n>:занятие<n>
амал<n>:занятие<n>
amaldor<n>:должностное_лицо<n>
амалдор<n>:должностное_лицо<n>
amaldori<n>:руководство<n>
амалдори<n>:руководство<n>
amaliyot<n>:деятельность<n>
амалийот<n>:деятельность<n>
amalparast<n>:карьерист<n>
амалпараст<n>:карьерист<n>
amaro<n>:товарищ<n>
амаро<n>:товарищ<n>
ama-xůmbaӡ<n>:месяц_созревания_всех_плодов<n>
ама-ху̊мбаӡ<n>:месяц_созревания_всех_плодов<n>
amaǰī<n>:название_птицы<n>
амаҷӣ<n>:название_птицы<n>
amaǰīd<n>:название_птицы<n>
амаҷӣд<n>:название_птицы<n>
amā<n>:тетка<n>
амā<n>:тетка<n>
amagůn<n>:тетка<n>
амагу̊н<n>:тетка<n>
amayen<n>:тетка<n>
амайен<n>:тетка<n>
ammā<n>:тетка<n>
аммā<n>:тетка<n>
ammagůn<n>:тетка<n>
аммагу̊н<n>:тетка<n>
ammayen<n>:тетка<n>
аммайен<n>:тетка<n>
amā<n>:тетушка<n>
амā<n>:тетушка<n>
amagůn<n>:тетушка<n>
амагу̊н<n>:тетушка<n>
amayen<n>:тетушка<n>
амайен<n>:тетушка<n>
ammā<n>:тетушка<n>
аммā<n>:тетушка<n>
ammagůn<n>:тетушка<n>
аммагу̊н<n>:тетушка<n>
ammayen<n>:тетушка<n>
аммайен<n>:тетушка<n>
ambar<n>:название_душистой_травы<n>
амбар<n>:название_душистой_травы<n>
ambêx̌c<n>:древовидный_можжевельник<n>
амбêх̌ц<n>:древовидный_можжевельник<n>
ambax̌c<n>:древовидный_можжевельник<n>
амбах̌ц<n>:древовидный_можжевельник<n>
ambex̌c<n>:древовидный_можжевельник<n>
амбех̌ц<n>:древовидный_можжевельник<n>
anbax̌c<n>:древовидный_можжевельник<n>
анбах̌ц<n>:древовидный_можжевельник<n>
ambor<n>:зерно_или_мука<n>
амбор<n>:зерно_или_мука<n>
ambordor<n>:владелец_запасов_зерна<n>
амбордор<n>:владелец_запасов_зерна<n>
ambori<n>:запасы_муки_или_зерна<n>
амбори<n>:запасы_муки_или_зерна<n>
ambur<n>:щипцы<n>
амбур<n>:щипцы<n>
anbur<n>:щипцы<n>
анбур<n>:щипцы<n>
ambůn<n>:амбон<n>
амбу̊н<n>:амбон<n>
anbůn<n>:амбон<n>
анбу̊н<n>:амбон<n>
ambůn<n>:амбон<n>
амбу̊н<n>:амбон<n>
anbůn<n>:амбон<n>
анбу̊н<n>:амбон<n>
amwatan<n>:соотечественник<n>
амwатан<n>:соотечественник<n>
amgap<n>:собеседник<n>
амгап<n>:собеседник<n>
amdard<n>:тот<n>
амдард<n>:тот<n>
amdard<n>:товарищ_по_несчастью<n>
амдард<n>:товарищ_по_несчастью<n>
amdardi<n>:соболезнование<n>
амдарди<n>:соболезнование<n>
amdars<n>:соученик<n>
амдарс<n>:соученик<n>
amdil<n>:одного_мнения<n>
амдил<n>:одного_мнения<n>
amdīn<n>:единоверец<n>
амдӣн<n>:единоверец<n>
amdīn<n>:и_с_м_амдн<n>
амдӣн<n>:и_с_м_амдн<n>
amdod<n>:помощь<n>
амдод<n>:помощь<n>
amdodgār<n>:помощник<n>
амдодгāр<n>:помощник<n>
ameð<n>:надежда<n>
амеδ<n>:надежда<n>
umeð<n>:надежда<n>
умеδ<n>:надежда<n>
amex̌a-pati<n>:игрок_в_поло<n>
амех̌а-пати<n>:игрок_в_поло<n>
amex̌a-patti<n>:игрок_в_поло<n>
амех̌а-патти<n>:игрок_в_поло<n>
āmiyat<n>:значение<n>
āмийат<n>:значение<n>
amiyat<n>:значение<n>
амийат<n>:значение<n>
amīr<n>:эмир<n>
амӣр<n>:эмир<n>
amīr<n>:компонент_имени_собств_муж<n>
амӣр<n>:компонент_имени_собств_муж<n>
amkasp<n>:коллега<n>
амкасп<n>:коллега<n>
amkor<n>:коллега<n>
амкор<n>:коллега<n>
amkori<n>:сотрудничество<n>
амкори<n>:сотрудничество<n>
amlā-ðāðīǰ<n>:пловец<n>
амлā-δāδӣҷ<n>:пловец<n>
amla-ðāðīǰ<n>:пловец<n>
амла-δāδӣҷ<n>:пловец<n>
amlazan<n>:пловец<n>
амлазан<n>:пловец<n>
amlā<n>:нападение<n>
амлā<n>:нападение<n>
amlā<n>:взмах<n>
амлā<n>:взмах<n>
amlā<n>:темп<n>
амлā<n>:темп<n>
amnax̌īn<n>:соратник<n>
амнах̌ӣн<n>:соратник<n>
amnix̌īn<n>:соратник<n>
амних̌ӣн<n>:соратник<n>
amnum<n>:тезка<n>
амнум<n>:тезка<n>
amo<n>:орелбородач<n>
амо<n>:орелбородач<n>
amowozi<n>:согласие<n>
амоwози<n>:согласие<n>
amoyīl<n>:перевязь<n>
амойӣл<n>:перевязь<n>
amol<n>:сверстник<n>
амол<n>:сверстник<n>
amorat<n>:здание<n>
аморат<n>:здание<n>
imorat<n>:здание<n>
иморат<n>:здание<n>
amorat<n>:наряд<n>
аморат<n>:наряд<n>
imorat<n>:наряд<n>
иморат<n>:наряд<n>
amorat-xůnā<n>:дворец<n>
аморат-ху̊нā<n>:дворец<n>
imorat-xůnā<n>:дворец<n>
иморат-ху̊нā<n>:дворец<n>
amoč<n>:клецки<n>
амоч<n>:клецки<n>
amočeǰ<n>:мука_для_приготовления_мелких_клецок<n>
амочеҷ<n>:мука_для_приготовления_мелких_клецок<n>
amoǰak<n>:эфедра<n>
амоҷак<n>:эфедра<n>
ampīrā<n>:люди<n>
ампӣрā<n>:люди<n>
amradīf<n>:сверстник<n>
амрадӣф<n>:сверстник<n>
amri<n>:приказ<n>
амри<n>:приказ<n>
amro<n>:попутчик<n>
амро<n>:попутчик<n>
amrogůn<n>:попутчик<n>
амрогу̊н<n>:попутчик<n>
amroyen<n>:попутчик<n>
амройен<n>:попутчик<n>
amro<n>:друг<n>
амро<n>:друг<n>
amrogůn<n>:друг<n>
амрогу̊н<n>:друг<n>
amroyen<n>:друг<n>
амройен<n>:друг<n>
amroz<n>:наперсник<n>
амроз<n>:наперсник<n>
amsabaq<n>:соученик<n>
амсабақ<n>:соученик<n>
amsaf<n>:соратник<n>
амсаф<n>:соратник<n>
amsin<n>:сверстник<n>
амсин<n>:сверстник<n>
amsind<n>:сверстник<n>
амсинд<n>:сверстник<n>
amsinf<n>:одноклассник<n>
амсинф<n>:одноклассник<n>
amsoyagi<n>:соседство<n>
амсойаги<n>:соседство<n>
amsoyador<n>:тот<n>
амсойадор<n>:тот<n>
amsoyā<n>:сосед<n>
амсойā<n>:сосед<n>
amsoyagůn<n>:сосед<n>
амсойагу̊н<n>:сосед<n>
amsoyayen<n>:сосед<n>
амсойайен<n>:сосед<n>
hamsoyā<n>:сосед<n>
ҳамсойā<n>:сосед<n>
amsol<n>:сверстник<n>
амсол<n>:сверстник<n>
amsůbat<n>:собеседник<n>
амсу̊бат<n>:собеседник<n>
amsūbat<n>:собеседник<n>
амсӯбат<n>:собеседник<n>
amtabāq<n>:сотрапезник<n>
амтабāқ<n>:сотрапезник<n>
amtabaq<n>:сотрапезник<n>
амтабақ<n>:сотрапезник<n>
amūð<n>:плодородная_почва<n>
амӯδ<n>:плодородная_почва<n>
ammům<n>:баня<n>
амму̊м<n>:баня<n>
amům<n>:баня<n>
аму̊м<n>:баня<n>
ammůmči<n>:банщик<n>
амму̊мчи<n>:банщик<n>
amůmči<n>:банщик<n>
аму̊мчи<n>:банщик<n>
amůn<n>:мир<n>
аму̊н<n>:мир<n>
amůnat<n>:заем<n>
аму̊нат<n>:заем<n>
amůnati<n>:заем<n>
аму̊нати<n>:заем<n>
amůni<n>:спокойствие<n>
аму̊ни<n>:спокойствие<n>
amšīrā<n>:сестра<n>
амшӣрā<n>:сестра<n>
angaxcīǰ<n>:заика<n>
ангахцӣҷ<n>:заика<n>
ingaxcīǰ<n>:заика<n>
ингахцӣҷ<n>:заика<n>
yingaxcīǰ<n>:заика<n>
йингахцӣҷ<n>:заика<n>
angilīs<n>:англичанин<n>
ангилӣс<n>:англичанин<n>
angirez<n>:англия<n>
ангирез<n>:англия<n>
angirez<n>:англичанин<n>
ангирез<n>:англичанин<n>
angirezi<n>:английский<n>
ангирези<n>:английский<n>
angix̌t<n>:палец<n>
ангих̌т<n>:палец<n>
ingax̌t<n>:палец<n>
ингах̌т<n>:палец<n>
yingax̌t<n>:палец<n>
йингах̌т<n>:палец<n>
angix̌tak<n>:пальчик<n>
ангих̌так<n>:пальчик<n>
ingax̌tak<n>:пальчик<n>
ингах̌так<n>:пальчик<n>
angix̌t-můk<n>:наперсток<n>
ангих̌т-му̊к<n>:наперсток<n>
ingax̌t-můg<n>:наперсток<n>
ингах̌т-му̊г<n>:наперсток<n>
ingax̌t-mūg<n>:наперсток<n>
ингах̌т-мӯг<n>:наперсток<n>
angix̌t-růn<n>:вторая_обмазка_стен<n>
ангих̌т-ру̊н<n>:вторая_обмазка_стен<n>
angix̌t-růni<n>:вторая_обмазка_стен<n>
ангих̌т-ру̊ни<n>:вторая_обмазка_стен<n>
angix̌t-rūn<n>:вторая_обмазка_стен<n>
ангих̌т-рӯн<n>:вторая_обмазка_стен<n>
angix̌t-rūni<n>:вторая_обмазка_стен<n>
ангих̌т-рӯни<n>:вторая_обмазка_стен<n>
ingax̌t-růn<n>:вторая_обмазка_стен<n>
ингах̌т-ру̊н<n>:вторая_обмазка_стен<n>
ingax̌t-růni<n>:вторая_обмазка_стен<n>
ингах̌т-ру̊ни<n>:вторая_обмазка_стен<n>
angišt<n>:каменный_уголь<n>
ангишт<n>:каменный_уголь<n>
angūrð<n>:виноградная_лоза<n>
ангӯрδ<n>:виноградная_лоза<n>
angūrð<n>:виноград<n>
ангӯрδ<n>:виноград<n>
angūrðdor<n>:владелец_винограда<n>
ангӯрδдор<n>:владелец_винограда<n>
angūrðzor<n>:виноградник<n>
ангӯрδзор<n>:виноградник<n>
angůxīǰ<n>:тот<n>
ангу̊хӣҷ<n>:тот<n>
ingůxīǰ<n>:тот<n>
ингу̊хӣҷ<n>:тот<n>
andaleb<n>:соловей<n>
андалеб<n>:соловей<n>
andalīb<n>:соловей<n>
андалӣб<n>:соловей<n>
andaleb<n>:имя_собств_муж_андалб<n>
андалеб<n>:имя_собств_муж_андалб<n>
andalīb<n>:имя_собств_муж_андалб<n>
андалӣб<n>:имя_собств_муж_андалб<n>
andex̌ā<n>:мысль<n>
андех̌ā<n>:мысль<n>
andex̌ā<n>:опасение<n>
андех̌ā<n>:опасение<n>
andiwol<n>:приятель<n>
андиwол<n>:приятель<n>
andiwolgůn<n>:приятель<n>
андиwолгу̊н<n>:приятель<n>
andiwolen<n>:приятель<n>
андиwолен<n>:приятель<n>
andīdak<n>:вставание<n>
андӣдак<n>:вставание<n>
indīdak<n>:вставание<n>
индӣдак<n>:вставание<n>
andovā<n>:штукатурка<n>
андовā<n>:штукатурка<n>
andoz<n>:налог<n>
андоз<n>:налог<n>
andozayeǰ<n>:материал<n>
андозайеҷ<n>:материал<n>
andoz<n>:мера<n>
андоз<n>:мера<n>
andozā<n>:мера<n>
андозā<n>:мера<n>
andoz<n>:мерка<n>
андоз<n>:мерка<n>
andozā<n>:мерка<n>
андозā<n>:мерка<n>
andům<n>:тело<n>
анду̊м<n>:тело<n>
indům<n>:тело<n>
инду̊м<n>:тело<n>
anor<n>:гранат<n>
анор<n>:гранат<n>
anor<n>:имя_собств_жен_или_его_компонент<n>
анор<n>:имя_собств_жен_или_его_компонент<n>
anorzor<n>:гранатовая_роща<n>
анорзор<n>:гранатовая_роща<n>
ansāmbul<n>:ансамбль<n>
ансāмбул<n>:ансамбль<n>
asāmbul<n>:ансамбль<n>
асāмбул<n>:ансамбль<n>
asānbul<n>:ансамбль<n>
асāнбул<n>:ансамбль<n>
ancāviӡ<n>:шитье<n>
анцāвиӡ<n>:шитье<n>
incāviӡ<n>:шитье<n>
инцāвиӡ<n>:шитье<n>
ancāvīǰ<n>:швец<n>
анцāвӣҷ<n>:швец<n>
incāvīǰ<n>:швец<n>
инцāвӣҷ<n>:швец<n>
yincāvīǰ<n>:швец<n>
йинцāвӣҷ<n>:швец<n>
anӡem<n>:годовалая_овечка<n>
анӡем<n>:годовалая_овечка<n>
anӡemak<n>:годовалая_овечка<n>
анӡемак<n>:годовалая_овечка<n>
inӡem<n>:годовалая_овечка<n>
